Georgia statutes. TITLE 52 Waters of the State, Ports, and Watercraft
Cross references.

Rivers, coastal waters, beaches, T. 12, C. 5.

Law reviews.

For article discussing the legislative changes in water law and the Environmental Protection Division in 1976 and 1977, see 29 Mercer L. Rev. 131 (1977).

For article discussing recent legislative and judicial developments in zoning, planning and environmental law, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 89 (1979).